apertium-en-mt.mt.metadix
    <pardef n="[ittraduċ]a__vblex">
      <e><p><l><prm/>ejt</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ejt</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>a</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>iet</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ejna</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ejtu</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ew</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ejtx</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ejtx</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>iex</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ietx</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ejniex</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ejtux</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ewx</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>n<prm/>i</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t<prm/>i</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>j<prm/>i</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t<prm/>i</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n<prm/>u</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t<prm/>u</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>j<prm/>u</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n<prm/>ix</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t<prm/>ix</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>j<prm/>ix</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t<prm/>ix</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n<prm/>ux</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t<prm/>ux</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>j<prm/>ux</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l><prm/>i</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>u</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ix</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ux</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="[aġġastj]a__vblex">
      <e><p><l><prm/>ajt</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ajt</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>a</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>at</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ajna</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ajtu</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>aw</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ajtx</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ajtx</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>iex</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>atx</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ajniex</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>ajtux</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>awx</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>n<prm/>a</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t<prm/>a</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>j<prm/>a</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t<prm/>a</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n<prm/>aw</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t<prm/>aw</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>j<prm/>aw</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n<prm/>iex</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t<prm/>iex</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>j<prm/>iex</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t<prm/>iex</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n<prm/>iewx</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t<prm/>iewx</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>j<prm/>iewx</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l><prm/>a</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>aw</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>iex</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><prm/>awx</l><r><prm/>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ittraduċa"><par n="[ittraduċ]a__vblex" prm="ittraduċ"/></e>
    <e lm="irreaġixxa"><par n="[ittraduċ]a__vblex" prm="irreaġixx"/></e>
    <e lm="ippromwova"><par n="[ittraduċ]a__vblex" prm="ippromwov"/></e>
    <e lm="ipprova"><par n="[ittraduċ]a__vblex" prm="ipprov"/></e>
    <e lm="aġġastja"><par n="[aġġastj]a__vblex" prm="aġġastj"/></e>
    <e lm="eżerċita"><par n="[aġġastj]a__vblex" prm="eżerċit"/></e>
